tests/июнь.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах июнь":
    июнь<n><nom> :  июнь 
    июнь<n><gen> :  июнӗн 
    июнь<n><dat> :  июне 
    июнь<n><loc> :  июньте
    июнь<n><abl> :  июньтен
    июнь<n><ins> :  июньпе 
    июнь<n><abe> :  июньсӗр 
    июнь<n><ben> :  июньшӗн
    июнь<n><px1sg><nom> :  июнӗм 
    июнь<n><px1sg><gen> :  июнӗмӗн 
    июнь<n><px1sg><dat> :  июнӗме 
    июнь<n><px1sg><loc> :  июнӗмре 
    июнь<n><px1sg><abl> :  июнӗмрен 
    июнь<n><px1sg><ins> :  июнӗмпе 
    июнь<n><px1sg><abe> :  июнӗмсӗр 
    июнь<n><px1sg><ben> :  июнӗмшӗн
    июнь<n><px2sg><nom> :  июнӳ 
    июнь<n><px2sg><gen> :  июнӳн 
    июнь<n><px2sg><dat> :  июньне
    июнь<n><px2sg><loc> :  июнӳнте 
    июнь<n><px2sg><abl> :  июнӳнтен 
    июнь<n><px2sg><ins> :  июнӳпе 
    июнь<n><px2sg><abe> :  июнӳсӗр 
    июнь<n><px2sg><ben> :  июнӳшӗн
    июнь<n><px3sp><nom> :  июнӗ 
    июнь<n><px3sp><gen> :  июнӗн 
    июнь<n><px3sp><dat> :  июньне 
    июнь<n><px3sp><loc> :  июнӗнче 
    июнь<n><px3sp><abl> :  июнӗнчен 
    июнь<n><px3sp><ins> :  июнӗпе 
    июнь<n><px3sp><abe> :  июнӗсӗр 
    июнь<n><px3sp><ben> :  июнӗшӗн
    июнь<n><px1pl><nom> :  июнӗмӗр 
    июнь<n><px1pl><gen> :  июнӗмӗрӗн 
    июнь<n><px1pl><dat> :  июнӗмӗре 
    июнь<n><px1pl><loc> :  июнӗмӗрте 
    июнь<n><px1pl><abl> :  июнӗмӗртен 
    июнь<n><px1pl><ins> :  июнӗмӗрпе 
    июнь<n><px1pl><abe> :  июнӗмӗрсӗр 
    июнь<n><px1pl><ben> :  июнӗмӗршӗн
    июнь<n><px2pl><nom> :  июнӗр 
    июнь<n><px2pl><gen> :  июнӗрӗн 
    июнь<n><px2pl><dat> :  июнӗре 
    июнь<n><px2pl><loc> :  июнӗрте 
    июнь<n><px2pl><abl> :  июнӗртен 
    июнь<n><px2pl><ins> :  июнӗрпе 
    июнь<n><px2pl><abe> :  июнӗрсӗр 
    июнь<n><px2pl><ben> :  июнӗршӗн
    июнь<n><pl><nom> :  июньсем 
    июнь<n><pl><gen> :  июньсен 
    июнь<n><pl><dat> :  июньсене 
    июнь<n><pl><loc> :  июньсенче 
    июнь<n><pl><abl> :  июньсенчен 
    июнь<n><pl><ins> :  июньсемпе 
    июнь<n><pl><abe> :  июньсемсӗр 
    июнь<n><pl><ben> :  июньсемшӗн
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  июнӗмсем 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  июнӗмсен 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  июнӗмсене 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  июнӗмсенче 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  июнӗмсенчен 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  июнӗмсемпе 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  июнӗмсемсӗр 
    июнь<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  июнӗмсемшӗн
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  июнӳсем 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  июнӳсен 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  июнӳсене 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  июнӳсенче 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  июнӳсенчен 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  июнӳсемпе 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  июнӳсемсӗр 
    июнь<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  июнӳсемшӗн
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  июнӗсем 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  июнӗсен 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  июнӗсене 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  июнӗсенче 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  июнӗсенчен 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  июнӗсемпе 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  июнӗсемсӗр 
    июнь<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  июнӗсемшӗн
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  июнӗмӗрсем 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  июнӗмӗрсен 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  июнӗмӗрсене 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  июнӗмӗрсенче 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  июнӗмӗрсенчен 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  июнӗмӗрсемпе 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  июнӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    июнь<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  июнӗмӗрсемшӗн
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  июнӗрсем 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  июнӗрсен 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  июнӗрсене 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  июнӗрсенче 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  июнӗрсенчен 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  июнӗрсемпе 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  июнӗрсемсӗр 
    июнь<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  июнӗрсемшӗн
